Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 90.324 is amended to read:
90.324. (1) No later than September 30th of each year, the Oregon Department  of Administrative
Services shall calculate the maximum annual rent increase percentage  allowed [ by ORS 90.323 (2)
or 90.600 (1) ] for the following calendar year :
(a) For tenancies subject  to ORS 90.600 (1) in facilities with more than 30 spaces, as six
percent.
(b) For tenancies subject to ORS  90.600 (1) in facilities with 30 or fewer spaces or for
tenancies subject to ORS 90.323,  as the lesser of:
[(a)] (A)  Ten percent; or
[(b)] (B)  Seven percent plus [ the September annual 12-month average change in the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as most  recently published by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor ] CPI.
(2) No later than September  30th of each year, the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices shall publish the maximum annual  rent increase [ percentage calculated pursuant to subsection
(1) of ] percentages allowed under this section, along with the provisions of ORS 90.323 and 90.600,
in a press release.
(3) The department shall maintain publicly available information on its website about the  maxi-
mum annual rent increase  [ percentage] percentages  for the previous calendar year and for the
current calendar year and, on or after September 30th of each year, for the following calendar  year.
(4) As used in this  section, “CPI” means the September annual 12-month average change
in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items), as most
recently published by the Bureau of Labor  Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor.
SECTION 2.  ORS 90.545 is amended to read:
90.545. (1) Except as  provided under subsections (2) to (6) of this section, a fixed term tenancy
for space for a manufactured  dwelling or floating home, upon reaching its ending date, automatically
renews as a month-to-month tenancy having the same terms and conditions, other than duration and
Enrolled House Bill 3054 (HB 3054-A) Page 1
rent increases under  ORS 90.600, unless the tenancy is terminated under ORS 90.380 (5)(b), 90.394,
90.396, 90.398, 90.630 or 90.632.
(2) To renew or extend a fixed term tenancy for another term, of any duration that  is consistent
with ORS 90.550, the landlord shall submit the proposed new rental agreement  to the tenant at least
60 days prior to  the ending date of the term. The landlord shall include with the proposed agreement
a written statement that summarizes any new or revised terms, conditions, rules or regulations.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 90.610 (2), a landlord’s  proposed new rental agreement may include
new or revised terms, conditions, rules or regulations, if the  new or revised terms, conditions, rules
or regulations:
(a)(A) Fairly implement a statute or ordinance adopted after the creation  of the existing agree-
ment; or
(B) Are the same as those offered to new or prospective tenants in  the facility at the time the
proposed agreement is submitted to the tenant and for the six-month period preceding the  sub-
mission of the proposed  agreement or, if there have been no new or prospective tenants during the
six-month period, are the same as are customary for the rental market;
(b) Are consistent  with the rights and remedies provided to tenants under this chapter, including
the right to keep a pet pursuant to ORS  90.530 and limits on rent increases under ORS 90.600
(1);
(c) Do not  relate to the age, size, style, construction material or year of construction of the
manufactured dwelling or floating home contrary to ORS 90.632 (2); and
(d) Do not require an alteration of the manufactured dwelling or floating home or alteration or
new construction of an accessory building or structure.
(4) A tenant shall accept or reject a landlord’s proposed new rental agreement at least 30  days
prior to the ending of the term by giving written notice to the landlord.
(5) If a landlord fails to submit a proposed new rental  agreement as provided by subsection (2)
of this section, the  tenancy renews as a month-to-month tenancy as provided by subsection (1) of this
section.
(6) If  a tenant fails to accept or unreasonably rejects a landlord’s proposed new rental agree-
ment as provided  by subsection (4) of this section, the fixed term tenancy terminates on the ending
date without further notice and the landlord may take possession by complying with ORS  105.100
to 105.168.
(7) If a tenancy terminates under conditions  described in subsection (6) of this section, and the
tenant surrenders or delivers possession of the premises to the landlord prior to the filing of  an
action pursuant to ORS 105.110, the tenant has the right to enter into a written storage agreement
with the landlord, with the tenant having the same rights and  responsibilities as a lienholder under
ORS 90.675 (20), except that the landlord may limit the term of the storage agreement to not exceed
six months. Unless the parties agree  otherwise, the storage agreement must commence upon the
date of  the termination of the tenancy. The rights under ORS 90.675 of any lienholder are delayed
until the end of the tenant storage agreement.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 90.600 is amended to read:
90.600. (1) If a rental agreement is  a month-to-month tenancy to which ORS 90.505 to 90.850
apply, the landlord may not increase the rent:
(a) Without giving each affected tenant notice in writing at  least 90 days prior to the effective
date of the rent increase;
(b) More than once in any 12-month period; or
(c) By a percentage greater than the maximum calculated under ORS 90.324 (1).
(2) The written notice required by subsection (1)(a) of this section must specify:
(a) The amount of the rent increase;
(b) The amount of the new rent;
(c) Facts supporting the exemption authorized by  subsection (3) of this section, if the increase
is above the amount allowed in subsection (1)(c) of this section; and
(d) The date on which the increase becomes effective.
Enrolled House Bill 3054 (HB 3054-A) Page 2
(3) A [ landlord] rent increase  is not subject to subsection (1)(c) of this section if:
(a) The first certificate of occupancy for the dwelling unit  was issued less than 15 years from
the date of the notice of the rent increase; [ or]
(b) The dwelling unit is regulated or certified as affordable  housing by a federal, state or local
government and the change in rent:
(A) Does not increase the tenant’s portion of the rent; or
(B) Is required by program eligibility requirements or by a change in the tenant’s income[ .]; or
(c) The rent increase is:
(A) For a facility with more than 30 spaces;
(B) Not greater than 12 percent;
(C) In lieu of and not in addition  to a rent increase allowed within the 12-month period
as described in subsection (1) of this section;
(D) Occurring at least five years following a previous rent increase authorized  under this
paragraph, if any;
(E) Related to a significant project to add, replace, repair or upgrade infrastructure  for
the facility;
(F) Approved by a written affirmative vote of 51 percent of the spaces in the facility that
are occupied by tenants on a vote  that contains the signature and identifies the space of the
voter;
(G) Approved by votes under subparagraph (F) of this paragraph that are collected:
(i) At least 30 days after the landlord has provided in  writing to each tenant the proposed
infrastructure project, a documented estimate of the cost of the project, an  estimated
timeline for the start and completion date for the project and the estimate of the rent  in-
crease necessary to cover the cost of the improvement; and
(ii) At least 14  days after the landlord has met with the tenants to discuss the proposal;
and
(H) Fully refunded to  tenants by the landlord, without demand, less the maximum al-
lowable rent increase under ORS 90.324, if  the project is not substantially completed as de-
scribed in the  notice under subparagraph (G)(i) of this paragraph within 12 months of the
estimated completion date in the notice.
(4) A landlord that increases  rent in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be liable
to the tenant in an amount equal to three months’ rent plus actual damages suffered  by the tenant.
(5) This section does not create a right to increase rent that does not otherwise exist.
(6) This section does not  require a landlord to compromise, justify or reduce a rent increase that
the landlord otherwise is entitled to impose.
(7) Neither ORS 90.510 (1), requiring a landlord to provide a  statement of policy, nor ORS 90.510
(4), requiring a landlord to provide a written rental agreement, creates a basis  for tenant challenge
of a rent increase, judicially or otherwise.
(8)(a) The tenants who reside in a facility may  elect one committee of seven or fewer members
in a facility-wide election to represent the tenants. One tenant of record  for each rented space may
vote in the election. Upon  written request from the tenants’ committee, the landlord or a represen-
tative of the landlord shall meet with the committee within  10 to 30 days of the request to discuss
the tenants’ nonrent concerns regarding the facility. Unless the parties agree  otherwise, upon a
request from the tenants’ committee, a  landlord or representative of the landlord shall meet with the
tenants’ committee at  least once, but not more than twice, each calendar year. The meeting shall
be held on the premises  if the facility has suitable meeting space for that purpose, or at a location
reasonably convenient to the tenants. After the meeting, the tenants’  committee shall send a writ-
ten summary of the issues and concerns addressed at the meeting to the landlord. The landlord  or
the landlord’s representative shall make a good faith response in  writing to the committee’s sum-
mary within 60 days.
Enrolled House Bill 3054 (HB 3054-A) Page 3
(b) The tenants’ committee may be entitled to informal dispute  resolution under ORS 90.769 if
the landlord  or landlord’s representative fails to meet with the tenants’ committee or fails to re-
spond in good faith to the written summary as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 4.  ORS 90.680 is amended to read:
90.680. (1) As used in this section, “consignment” means an agreement  in which a tenant au-
thorizes a landlord to sell a manufactured dwelling or floating home on  behalf of the tenant who
owns the dwelling or home in a facility that is owned by the  landlord and for which the landlord
receives  compensation.
(2) A landlord may not deny  any manufactured dwelling or floating home space tenant the right
to sell a manufactured dwelling or floating home  on a rented space or require the tenant to remove
the dwelling or home from the space solely on the basis of the sale.
(3) A landlord may not require, as  a condition of a tenant’s occupancy, consignment of the
tenant’s manufactured dwelling or floating home.
(4)(a) A landlord may sell a tenant’s manufactured dwelling or floating home on  consignment
only if:
(A) The sale involves a dwelling in a facility and the landlord is licensed to  sell dwellings under
ORS 446.661 to 446.756. The license may be held by  a person that differs from the person that owns
the facility and is the landlord, if there is common ownership between the two.
(B) The landlord and tenant first enter into a written consignment contract that specifies at a
minimum:
(i) The duration of the contract, which, unless extended in writing, may not exceed 180 days;
(ii) The estimated square footage of the dwelling or home, and the make, model,  year, vehicle
identification number and license plate number, if known;
(iii) The price offered for sale of the dwelling or home;
(iv) Whether lender financing  is permitted and the amount, if any, of the earnest money deposit;
(v) Whether the transaction is intended to be closed through a state-licensed escrow;
(vi) All liens, taxes and other  charges known to be in existence against the dwelling or home
that must be removed before the tenant can convey marketable title to a prospective buyer;
(vii) The method  of marketing the sale of a dwelling or home to the public, such as signs posted
at the facility or through advertisements posted on the Internet or published in newspapers or in
other publications;
(viii) The form and amount of  compensation to the landlord, such as a fixed fee, a percentage
of the gross sale price or another similar arrangement.  If the form of compensation is a fixed fee,
the contract shall state the amount; and
(ix) For the purpose of determining the net sale proceeds  that are payable to the tenant, the
manner and order by which the gross sale  proceeds will be applied to liens, taxes, actual costs of
sale, landlord compensation and other closing costs.
(C) Within 10 days after a sale, the landlord  pays to the tenant the tenant’s share of the sale
proceeds and provides to the tenant a written accounting for the sale proceeds.
(b) The landlord may not exact a commission or fee, however designated, or retain a portion of
any sale proceeds for the sale of a manufactured dwelling or floating home on a rented  space unless
the landlord has acted as representative for the seller pursuant to a written consignment contract.
(5)(a) The landlord may not deny the tenant the right to place a “for sale” sign  on or in a
manufactured dwelling or floating home owned by the tenant. The size, placement  and character of
such signs shall be subject to reasonable rules of the landlord.
(b) If the landlord advertises a manufactured dwelling or floating home for  sale within the fa-
cility, the tenant may  advertise the sale of the tenant’s dwelling or home by posting a sign in a
similar manner and similar location.
(6) A landlord may not knowingly make  false statements to a prospective purchaser about the
quality of a tenant’s manufactured dwelling or floating home.
(7) Nothing in this section prevents a landlord from selling to  a prospective purchaser a manu-
factured dwelling or floating home owned by the landlord at a price or on terms, including  space
Enrolled House Bill 3054 (HB 3054-A) Page 4
rent, that are  more favorable than the price and terms offered for dwellings or homes that are for
sale by a tenant.
(8) If the prospective purchaser of a  manufactured dwelling or floating home desires to leave the
dwelling or home on the rented space and  become a tenant, the landlord may require in the rental
agreement:
(a) Except when a termination or abandonment occurs, that a tenant give not more than 10 days’
notice in writing prior to the sale of the dwelling or home on a rented space;
(b) That prior to the sale, the prospective purchaser  submit to the landlord a complete and ac-
curate written application for occupancy  of the dwelling or home as a tenant after the sale is fi-
nalized and that a prospective purchaser may not occupy the dwelling or  home until after the
prospective purchaser is accepted by the landlord as a tenant;
(c) That a tenant give notice to any lienholder,  prospective purchaser or person licensed to sell
dwellings or homes of the requirements  of paragraphs (b) and (d) of this subsection, the location of
all properly functioning smoke alarms and any other rules and regulations of  the facility such as
those described in ORS 90.510 (5)(b), (f), (g), (i) and (j); and
(d) If the sale is  not by a lienholder, that the prospective purchaser pay in full all rents, fees,
deposits or  charges owed by the tenant as authorized under ORS 90.140 and the rental agreement,
prior to the landlord’s acceptance of the prospective purchaser as a tenant.
(9)(a) If a landlord requires a prospective purchaser to submit an application for occupancy as
a tenant under subsection (8) of this section, the landlord shall provide, upon request from the  pur-
chaser, a copy of the application. At the  time that the landlord gives the prospective purchaser an
application the landlord shall also give the prospective purchaser:
(A) Copies of the statement of policy, the rental agreement  and the facility rules and regu-
lations, including any conditions imposed on a subsequent sale, all as provided by ORS 90.510;
(B) Copies of any outstanding notices given to the tenant under ORS 90.632;
(C) A list of any disrepair or deterioration of the manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(D) A list of any failures to maintain  the space or to comply with any other provisions of the
rental agreement[ , including aesthetic or cosmetic improvements ]; and
(E) A  statement that the landlord may require a prospective purchaser to complete repairs[ ,]
and maintenance [ and improvements ] as described  in the notices and lists provided under subpara-
graphs (B) to (D) of this paragraph.
(b) The terms of the statement  of policy , rental agreement and rules and regulations need  not
be the same as those in the selling tenant’s statement, rental agreement and rules and regulations.
(c) Consistent with ORS 90.305 (4)(b), a landlord may require a prospective purchaser to  pay a
reasonable copying charge for the documents.
(d) If a prospective purchaser  agrees, a landlord may provide the documents in an electronic
format.
(10) The  following apply if a landlord receives an application for tenancy from a prospective
purchaser under subsection (8) of this section:
(a) The landlord shall accept or reject the prospective purchaser’s  application within seven days
following the day the landlord receives a  complete and accurate written application. An application
is not complete  until the prospective purchaser pays any required applicant screening charge and
provides the landlord with all information  and documentation, including any financial data and ref-
erences, required by the landlord pursuant to ORS  90.510 (5)(i). The landlord and the prospective
purchaser may agree  to a longer time period for the landlord to evaluate the prospective purchaser’s
application  or  to allow the prospective purchaser to address any failure to meet the landlord’s
screening or admission criteria. If a tenant has not previously given the landlord  the 10 days’ notice
required under subsection (8)(a) of this section,  the period provided for the landlord to accept or
reject a complete and accurate written application is extended to 10 days.
(b) When  a landlord considers an application for tenancy from a prospective purchaser of a
dwelling or home from a tenant, the landlord shall apply  to the prospective purchaser credit and
Enrolled House Bill 3054 (HB 3054-A) Page 5
conduct screening criteria that are substantially similar to the  credit and conduct screening criteria
the landlord applies to a prospective purchaser of a dwelling or home from the landlord.
(c) The landlord may  not unreasonably reject a prospective purchaser as a tenant. Reasonable
cause for rejection includes, but is not limited to, failure of the prospective purchaser to meet the
landlord’s conditions for  approval as provided in ORS 90.510 (5)(i) or failure of the prospective
purchaser’s references to respond to the landlord’s timely request for verification  within the time
allowed for acceptance or  rejection under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Except as provided in
paragraph (d) of this subsection, the landlord shall furnish to the seller and purchaser  a written
statement of the reasons for the rejection.
(d) If a rejection under paragraph (c) of this subsection is based upon a consumer report,  as
defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a for purposes of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, the landlord may
not disclose the contents of the report to anyone other than the purchaser. The  landlord shall dis-
close to the seller in writing that the rejection  is based upon information contained within a con-
sumer report and that the landlord may not disclose the information within the report.
(11) The  following apply if a landlord does not require a prospective purchaser to submit an
application for occupancy as a tenant under subsection (8) of this section or if the  landlord does not
accept or reject the prospective purchaser as a tenant within  the time required under subsection
(10) of this section:
(a) The landlord waives any right to bring an action against the tenant under the rental agree-
ment for breach of the landlord’s  right to establish conditions upon and approve a prospective pur-
chaser of the tenant’s dwelling or home;
(b) The prospective  purchaser, upon completion of the sale, may occupy the dwelling or home
as a tenant under the same conditions and terms as the tenant who sold the dwelling or home;  and
(c) If the prospective purchaser becomes a new tenant,  the landlord may impose conditions or
terms on the  tenancy that are inconsistent with the terms and conditions of the seller’s rental
agreement only if the new tenant agrees in writing.
(12) A landlord may not, because  of the age, size, style or original construction material of the
dwelling or home or because the  dwelling or home was built prior to adoption of the National
Manufactured  Housing  Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5403), in compli-
ance with the standards of that Act  in effect at that time or in compliance with the state building
code as defined in ORS 455.010:
(a) Reject an application for tenancy from a  prospective purchaser of an existing dwelling or
home on a rented space within a facility; or
(b) Require a prospective purchaser of  an existing dwelling or home on a rented space within
a facility to remove the dwelling or home from the rented space.
(13) A tenant who has received  a notice pursuant to ORS 90.632 may sell the tenant’s dwelling
or home in compliance with this  section during the notice period. The tenant shall provide a pro-
spective purchaser with  a copy of any outstanding notice given to the tenant under ORS 90.632 prior
to a sale. If the tenancy has been terminated pursuant to  ORS 90.632, or the notice period provided
in ORS 90.632 has expired without a correction of cause or extension  of time to correct, a pro-
spective purchaser does not have a right to leave  the dwelling or home on the rented space and
become a tenant.
(14) The following applies to a landlord that accepts a prospective purchaser as a tenant  under
subsection (10) of this section:
(a) Notwithstanding any waiver given by the landlord  to the previous tenant, the landlord may
require the new tenant to complete the repairs[ ,] and maintenance  [ and improvements ] described in
the notices provided under subsection (9)(a)(B) to (D) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 90.412, if the  new tenant fails to complete the repairs[ ,] or  mainte-
nance [ and improvements] described in the notices provided under subsection (9)(a)(B) to  (D) of this
section within six months after  the tenancy begins, the landlord may terminate the tenancy by giv-
ing the new tenant the notice required under ORS 90.630 or 90.632.
Enrolled House Bill 3054 (HB 3054-A) Page 6
(15) A landlord may not require that a selling  tenant, prospective purchaser or purchaser
consent to the inspection of the interior of the dwelling or home or obtain an inspection of
the interior of the dwelling or home by a third party, including as a condition of:
(a) Acceptance of the notice of sale under subsection (8)(a) of this section;
(b) Approval of a sale under this section; or
(c) Approval of a new tenancy by the purchaser.
[(15)] (16) Except as provided by subsection (13) of this section, after a  tenancy has ended and
during the period provided by ORS 90.675 (6) and (8), a former tenant retains the  right to sell the
tenant’s dwelling or home to a purchaser who wishes to leave the dwelling or home on  the rented
space and  become a tenant as provided by this section, if the former tenant makes timely periodic
payment of all storage charges as provided by  ORS 90.675 (7)(b), maintains the dwelling or home and
the rented space on which it is stored and  enters the premises only with the written permission of
the landlord. Payment  of the storage charges or maintenance of the dwelling or home and the space
does not create or reinstate a tenancy or create a waiver pursuant to  ORS 90.412 or 90.417. A for-
mer tenant may not enter the premises without the written permission of the landlord, including
entry to maintain the dwelling or home or the space or to facilitate a sale.
[(16)] (17) A landlord or tenant who sells a manufactured dwelling or  floating home shall deliver
title to the dwelling or home to the purchaser within 25 business days after completion of the sale.
If the sale by contract requires future payments, the landlord  or tenant shall notify the county that
the purchaser is responsible for property tax payments.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
September 1, 2025.
Passed by House April 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3054 (HB 3054-A) Page 7